Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-6,100
Parkinson's Disease Registry; contents.

The department shall establish and maintain the Parkinson's Disease Registry. The registry shall consist of a compilation of the reports of cases of Parkinson's disease and related movement disorders occurring among residents of this state which are with the department. The registry shall include information the department deems necessary and appropriate for the statistical identification and planning for treatment and education of health care providers and persons diagnosed with Parkinson's disease and related movement disorders.

Laws 2001, LB 152, § 8.